Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2066.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; state treasurer; broadband and fiber optic networks The sum of $8,000,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the state treasurer for distribution to the city of Apache Junction for the expansion of broadband and fiber optic networks.